Utah statutes.
58-37b-8.   Exemption of persons registered under Controlled Substances Act.

No civil or criminal liability shall be imposed by virtue of this act on any person registered under the Controlled Substances Act who manufactures, distributes, or possesses an imitation controlled substance for use as a placebo or investigational new drug by a registered practitioner in the ordinary course of professional practice or research or on any law enforcement officer acting in the course and legitimate scope of that employment.

